Utah statutes.
75-5-414.   Compensation and expenses.

If not otherwise compensated for services rendered, any visitor, lawyer, physician, conservator, or special conservator appointed in a protective proceeding is entitled to reasonable compensation from the estate.  If the court appoints the petitioner or the petitioner's nominee as conservator over the protected person, regardless of whether the nominee is specified in the moving petition or nominated during the proceedings, the petitioner is entitled to receive from the estate reasonable attorney fees and court costs incurred in bringing and defending the petition.



Amended by Chapter 274, 2012 General Session

